Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB263.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 156 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that locally driven innovation in public education can improve
school operations and student outcomes. It is the intent of the General Assembly that Sections 2, 3, and 4 of this
Act provide local boards of education with flexibility to depart from statutory and administrative requirements that
may constrain improvement, in order to pilot, implement, and refine innovative practices, particularly in schools
serving students with unmet academic needs, where such practices are informed by promising approaches
implemented in other public education settings, while maintaining appropriate safeguards for student welfare and
academic achievement.
Section 2. KRS 156.161 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in Section 3 of this Act or otherwise provided in statute, the Kentucky Board of
Education, upon the request of the local board of education of a school district, may grant a waiver from the
requirements of an administrative regulation promulgated by the state board or from a statute over which the
state board has authority to enforce. The state board may also grant a waiver from the requirements of an
administrative regulation promulgated by the Education Professional Standards Board or from a statute
over which the Education Professional Standards Board has authority to enforce, after consultation with
the Education Professional Standards Board. A waiver granted by the state board shall expire on June 30 of
the third full school year after the request was first approved, regardless of subsequent amendment, unless the
state board renews the waiver prior to expiration. However, a waiver granted for specific school district
facility projects, such as the waiver of requirements for the construction or renovation of school buildings
or the acquisition or disposition of property, shall not expire unless the state board specifically provides for
expiration when granting the waiver. The state board shall not approve any waiver request to overturn a
certification determination of a specific individual by the Education Professional Standards Board. The
state board shall not waive any statute or administrative regulation:
(a) Relating to health and safety, including required criminal background checks for staff and volunteers
specified in KRS 160.380 and 161.148;
(b) Relating to civil rights;
(c) Required by federal law;
(d) Relating to compulsory attendance requirements under KRS 158.030 and 158.100, or the recording of
data necessary for participation in the fund to support education excellence in Kentucky;
(e) Establishing certification requirements for teachers[ in core academic areas], except a waiver may
authorize up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the teaching staff of a school may be employed without
teacher certification if the individual possesses a:[ ]
1. Baccalaureate or graduate degree in the subject the individual is hired to teach; or
2. Recognized industry credential in the technical education area the individual is hired to teach;
(f) Requiring students' participation in state assessment of student performance as required under KRS
158.6453;
(g) Financial audits, audit procedures, and audit requirements under KRS 156.265;
(h) Open records and open meeting requirements under KRS Chapter 61;
(i) Purchasing requirements and limitations under KRS Chapter 45A and KRS 156.074 and 156.480; or
(j) Requiring instructional time that is at least equivalent to the student instructional year specified in KRS
158.070.
(2) A waiver request under subsection (1) of this section shall:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Identify the specific statutes and administrative regulations for which the local board is seeking a
waiver;
(b) Specify the schools or programs within the district to which the waiver shall apply;
(c) Explain how the waiver for the schools or programs of each specific statute or administrative regulation
will improve operations or student academic achievement; and
(d) Include any evidence the district wishes to submit to support the request.
(3) A local board may request the Kentucky Department of Education to assist in the development of a waiver
request. To receive assistance, a local board shall provide the department with a list of innovative practices
the local board intends to submit in a waiver request. The department shall provide a timely analysis of the
list to the local board that identifies which statutes and administrative regulations under the authority of the
state board or the Education Professional Standards Board, if any, would need to be waived to allow the
innovative practice.
(4) The department may provide the state board an analysis of a waiver request to assist the state board with
consideration of the waiver request. However, if the waiver request was previously analyzed by the
department while assisting under subsection (3) of this section and has not been modified, then the analysis
for the state board shall be consistent with the completed analysis for the local board. The department and
the commissioner shall not recommend approval or denial to the state board, but may provide the benefits
and disadvantages of approving the waiver request.
(5) Upon the majority vote of a local board approving a waiver request, the superintendent of the district or the
local board's designee shall submit the waiver request to the state board. The state board shall consider the
waiver of each statute or administrative regulation included in the request at a[the next regularly scheduled]
meeting occurring no later than thirty (30) calendar days after submission and shall either approve or deny
the request. In considering approval for each statute or administrative regulation identified in a waiver request,
the state board shall grant the request if, when considered in conjunction with the findings and declarations
of Section 1 of this Act, the waiver request reasonably demonstrates[ it demonstrates] that approval[the
waiver] is more likely than not:
(a) To improve that school's or program's operation without hindering student academic achievement; or
(b) To improve student academic achievement at that school or program.
(6)[(4)] In submitting a waiver request for consideration under subsection (5)[(3)] of this section, a local board
may seek to identify the school or program that is the subject of the request as a school of innovation for the
purposes of providing innovative educational opportunities to students. An application for identification as
a school of innovation may also incorporate any waivers previously approved and in effect under this
section or Section 3 of this Act[In addition to any other waivers granted for the school or program, a school of
innovation shall be granted a waiver from all statutes and administrative regulations that would prevent the
district from entering into an agreement with an education service provider to assist in the management and
operation of the school or program]. The state board shall approve the request to be identified as a school of
innovation [request ]if the request demonstrates that all the approved waivers under this section and Section
3 of this Act attempt to improve student outcomes in a manner that would be difficult or impossible without
the approved waivers. Notwithstanding any previous expiration date, the waivers incorporated in the
identification as a school of innovation shall expire on June 30 of the third full school year after the
identification is made[is more likely than not to improve either that school's or program's operation or student
academic achievement].
(7)[(5)] A local board whose request to waive a statute or administrative regulation under subsection (5) or
(6)[(3) or (4)] of this section was denied may amend the original request for reconsideration at the state board's
next regularly scheduled meeting[. A local board may request assistance from the Kentucky Department of
Education in the development of the local board's waiver request or an amendment].
(8)[(6)] A local board may seek to amend a previously approved waiver request by submitting the amendment
for approval by the state board under the same procedures as the original request.
(9)[(7)] A local board that is granted a waiver under subsection (5) or (6)[(3) or (4)] of this section may submit
a request to renew the waiver to the state board. A renewal request shall be submitted no earlier than six (6)
months prior to that waiver's expiration. The renewal request shall include evidence of the operational
improvement of the school or program that is subject to the waiver, the academic achievement of the students
enrolled in the schools or program, comparisons of those students with similar students across the state, and

CHAPTER 180 3
any other evidence of the waiver's benefit to student academic achievement. If the state board finds that the
waiver has had a positive impact on the school's or program's operation or the academic achievement of
students, then the renewal request shall be approved. An approved renewal request shall extend the waiver for
an additional three (3) school years. However, a waiver related to school district facility projects, as identified
in subsection (1) of this section, shall not expire unless the state board specifically provides for expiration
when granting the waiver.
(10)[(8)] Any school that is subject to a waiver shall admit any and all children eligible to attend the school
subject to the local board's policies.
(11)[(9)] If the state board at any time finds by a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote that a specific waiver previously
granted has hindered school or program operations, endangered students, impeded student academic
achievement, or supported financial malfeasance or criminal activity, then the waiver shall be rescinded. The
existence of a waiver shall not negate the legal duties or professional responsibilities of a district employee.
(12) The Kentucky Board of Education, the commissioner of education, and the Kentucky Department of
Education shall not penalize a school district for an action that violates a statute or administrative
regulation if:
(a) The action was described in a request for assistance under subsection (3) of this section; and
(b) The analysis of the request for assistance submitted to the district by the department:
1. Indicated that the action would not violate any statute or administrative regulation in
existence at the time of the analysis; or
2. Did not include the statute or administrative regulation in existence at the time of the analysis
and the exact request for assistance was approved as a waiver request by the Kentucky Board
of Education.
(13)[(10)] The state board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
adopt a standardized waiver request form and establish any procedures for processing waiver requests in
compliance with this section.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 156 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of Section 2 of this Act to the contrary, the Kentucky Board of Education
shall establish and maintain a list of expedited waivers that a local board of education may submit to the
commissioner of education for approval. The list of expedited waivers shall include a waiver of all statutes
and administrative regulations that prohibit a district from entering into an agreement with an education
service provider to assist in the management and operation of a school or program. The waiver authority
delegated to the commissioner of education by the state board shall be subject to the same limitations
established in subsection (1) of Section 2 of this Act.
(2) The commissioner shall consider an expedited waiver submitted under subsection (1) of this section and
shall either approve or deny the request within ten (10) business days. The commissioner shall approve the
request unless he or she determines that the expedited waiver would substantially:
(a) Hinder the operation of the district's schools or programs that are the subject of the waiver; or
(b) Impede student academic achievement within the schools or programs that are the subject of the
waiver.
(3) An expedited waiver granted by the commissioner shall expire on June 30 of the third full school year after
the request was first approved, regardless of subsequent amendment, unless the commissioner renews the
waiver prior to expiration. The state board may extend the duration of specific expedited waivers on the list
for a longer time or permanently.
(4) If the commissioner at any time finds that a specific expedited waiver previously granted under this section
has substantially hindered school or program operations, endangered students, impeded student academic
achievement, or supported financial malfeasance or criminal activity, then the waiver shall be rescinded.
The existence of a waiver shall not negate the legal duties or professional responsibilities of district
employees.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) A local board may appeal the denial of an expedited waiver by the commissioner to the state board. To be
considered by the state board, the appeal shall be filed within thirty (30) days of the denial. The state board
shall consider the appeal within thirty (30) days of the appeal being filed.
(6) By July 1 of each year, the Kentucky Board of Education shall annually review the numbers and types of
expedited waivers approved under this section and waivers granted under Section 2 of this Act to determine
if any amendments to or repeals of administrative regulations are necessary. The review shall also include
the operation of schools of innovation under Section 2 of this Act. The state board may also recommend
statutory changes to the General Assembly to reduce unnecessary burdens on school districts and any new
best practices observed from schools of innovation that would benefit schools across the Commonwealth.
Section 4. KRS 157.360 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) In determining the cost of the program to support education excellence in Kentucky, the statewide
guaranteed base funding level, as defined in KRS 157.320, shall be computed by dividing the amount
appropriated for this purpose by the prior year's statewide average daily attendance.
(b) When determining the biennial appropriations for the program, the average daily attendance for each
fiscal year shall include an estimate of the number of students graduating early under the provisions of
KRS 158.142.
(2) Each district shall receive an amount equal to the base funding level for each pupil in average daily attendance
in the district in the previous year, except a district shall receive an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the state
portion of the average statewide per pupil guaranteed base funding level for each student who graduated early
under the provisions of KRS 158.142. Each district's base funding level shall be adjusted by the following
factors:
(a) The number of at-risk students in the district. At-risk students shall be identified as those approved for
the free lunch program under state and federal guidelines. The number of at-risk students shall be
multiplied by a factor to be established by the General Assembly. Funds generated under this paragraph
may be used to pay for:
1. Alternative programs for students who are at risk of dropping out of school before achieving a
diploma; and
2. A hazardous duty pay supplement as determined by the local board of education to the teachers
who work in alternative programs with students who are violent or assaultive;
(b) The number and types of exceptional children in the district as defined by KRS 157.200. Specific
weights for each category of exceptionality shall be used in the calculation of the add-on factor for
exceptional children; and
(c) Transportation costs. The per-pupil cost of transportation shall be calculated as provided by KRS
157.370. Districts which contract to furnish transportation to students attending nonpublic schools may
adopt any payment formula which ensures that no public school funds are used for the transportation of
nonpublic students.
(3) Beginning with the 2015-2016 school year and each year thereafter, the General Assembly shall annually
allocate funds equal to one-half (1/2) of the state portion of the average statewide per pupil guaranteed base
funding level for each student who graduated early under the provisions of KRS 158.142 the previous school
year to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority for deposit in the early graduation scholarship
trust fund.
(4) The program to support education excellence in Kentucky shall be fully implemented by the 1994-95 school
year.
(5) (a) Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision making, the commissioner of
education shall enforce maximum class sizes for every academic course requirement in all grades
except in vocal and instrumental music, and physical education classes. Except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, the maximum number of pupils enrolled in a class shall be as follows:
1. Twenty-four (24) in primary grades (kindergarten through third grade);
2. Twenty-eight (28) in grade four (4);
3. Twenty-nine (29) in grades five (5) and six (6);

CHAPTER 180 5
4. Thirty-one (31) in grades seven (7) to twelve (12).
(b) Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision making, class size loads for
middle and secondary school:
1. Classroom teachers shall not exceed the equivalent of one hundred fifty (150) pupil hours per
day; and
2. Virtual program teachers shall not exceed the equivalent of three hundred (300) pupil hours per
day.
(c) The commissioner of education, upon approval of the Kentucky Board of Education, shall adopt
administrative regulations for enforcing this provision. These administrative regulations shall include
procedures for a superintendent to request an exemption from the Kentucky Department[Board] of
Education when unusual circumstances warrant an increased class size for an individual class. A request
for an exemption shall include specific reasons for the increased class size with a plan for reducing the
class size prior to the beginning of the next school year. A district shall not receive in any one (1) year
exemptions for more classes than enroll twenty percent (20%) of the pupils in the primary grades and
grades four (4) through eight (8).
(d) In all schools the commissioner of education shall enforce the special education maximum class sizes
set by administrative regulations adopted by the Kentucky Board of Education. A superintendent or
school council may request an exemption pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection.[ A local school
council may request a waiver relating to maximum class size pursuant to KRS 156.161 in the same
manner as a local board of education.] An exemption or waiver shall not be granted if the increased
class size will impede any exceptional child from achieving his or her individual education program in
the least restrictive environment.
(6) In grades four (4) through six (6) with combined grades, the maximum class size shall be the average daily
attendance upon which funding is appropriated for the lowest assigned grade in the class. There shall be no
exceptions to the maximum class size for combined classes. In combined classes other than the primary
grades, no ungraded students shall be placed in a combined class with graded students. In addition, there shall
be no more than two (2) consecutive grade levels combined in any one (1) class in grades four (4) through six
(6). However, this shall not apply to schools which have implemented school-based decision making.
(7) If a local school district, through its admission and release committee, determines that an appropriate program
in the least restrictive environment for a particular child with a disability includes either part-time or full-time
enrollment with a private school or agency within the state or a public or private agency in another state, the
school district shall count as average daily attendance in a public school the time that the child is in attendance
at the school or agency, contingent upon approval by the commissioner of education.
(8) Pupils attending a center for child learning and study established under an agreement pursuant to KRS 65.210
to 65.300 shall, for the purpose of calculating average daily attendance, be considered as in attendance in the
school district in which the child legally resides and which is party to the agreement. For purposes of
subsection (1) of this section, teachers who are actually employees of the joint or cooperative action shall be
considered as employees of each school district which is a party to the agreement.
(9) Program funding shall be increased when the average daily attendance in any district for the first two (2)
months of the current school year is greater than the average daily attendance of the district for the first two (2)
months of the previous school year. The program funds allotted the district shall be increased by the percent of
increase. The average daily attendance in kindergarten is the kindergarten full-time equivalent pupils in
average daily attendance.
(10) If the average daily attendance for the current school year in any district decreases by ten percent (10%) or
more than the average daily attendance for the previous school year, the average daily attendance for purposes
of calculating program funding for the next school year shall be increased by an amount equal to two-thirds
(2/3) of the decrease in average daily attendance. If the average daily attendance remains the same or decreases
in the succeeding school year, the average daily attendance for purposes of calculating program funding for the
following school year shall be increased by an amount equal to one-third (1/3) of the decrease for the first year
of the decline.
(11) If the percentage of attendance of any school district shall have been reduced more than two percent (2%)
during the previous school year, the program funding allotted the district for the current school year shall be
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
increased by the difference in the percentage of attendance for the two (2) years immediately prior to the
current school year less two percent (2%).
(12) (a) Instructional salaries for vocational agriculture classes shall be for twelve (12) months per year.
Vocational agriculture teachers shall be responsible for the following program of instruction during the
time period beyond the regular school term established by the local board of education: supervision and
instruction of students in agriculture experience programs; group and individual instruction of farmers
and agribusinessmen; supervision of student members of agricultural organizations who are involved in
leadership training or other activity required by state or federal law; or any program of vocational
agriculture established by the Department of Education. During extended employment, no vocational
agriculture teacher shall receive salary on a day that the teacher is scheduled to attend an institution of
higher education class which could be credited toward meeting any certification requirement.
(b) Each teacher of agriculture employed shall submit an annual plan for summer program to the local
school superintendent for approval. The summer plan shall include a list of tasks to be performed,
purposes for each task, and time to be spent on each task. Approval by the local school superintendent
shall be in compliance with the guidelines developed by the Department of Education. The supervision
and accountability of teachers of vocational agriculture's summer programs shall be the responsibility of
the local school superintendent. The local school superintendent shall submit to the commissioner of
education a completed report of summer tasks for each vocational agriculture teacher. Twenty percent
(20%) of the approved vocational agriculture programs shall be audited annually by the State
Department of Education to determine that the summer plan has been properly executed.
(13) (a) In allotting program funds for home and hospital instruction, statewide guaranteed base funding,
excluding the capital outlay, shall be allotted for each child in average daily attendance in the prior
school year who has been properly identified according to Kentucky Board of Education administrative
regulations. Attendance shall be calculated pursuant to KRS 157.270 and shall be reported monthly on
forms provided by the Department of Education; and
(b) Pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education, local school districts shall
be reimbursed for home and hospital instruction for pupils unable to attend regular school sessions
because of short-term health impairments. A reimbursement formula shall be established by
administrative regulations to include such factors as a reasonable per hour, per child allotment for
teacher instructional time, with a maximum number of funded hours per week, a reasonable allotment
for teaching supplies and equipment, and a reasonable allotment for travel expenses to and from
instructional assignments, but the formula shall not include an allotment for capital outlay. Attendance
shall be calculated pursuant to KRS 157.270 and shall be reported annually on forms provided by the
Department of Education.
(14) Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision making and the school council has
voted to waive this subsection and for virtual programs, kindergarten aides shall be provided for each twenty-
four (24) full-time equivalent kindergarten students enrolled.
(15) Effective July 1, 2001, there shall be no deduction applied against the base funding level for any pupil in
average daily attendance who spends a portion of his or her school day in a program at a state-operated career
and technical education or vocational facility.
(16) During a fiscal year, a school district may request that the Department of Education recalculate its funds
allocated under this section if the current year average daily attendance for the twenty (20) day school month
as defined in KRS 158.060(2) that contains the most days within the calendar month of January exceeds the
prior year adjusted average daily attendance plus growth by at least one percent (1%). Any adjustments in the
allotments approved under this subsection shall be proportional to the remaining days in the school year and
subject to available funds under the program to support education excellence in Kentucky.
(17) To calculate the state portion of the program to support education excellence in Kentucky for a school district,
the Department of Education shall subtract the local effort required under KRS 157.390(5) from the calculated
base funding under the program to support education excellence in Kentucky, as required by this section. The
value of the real estate used in this calculation shall be the lesser of the current year assessment or the prior
year assessment increased by four percent (4%) plus the value of current year new property. The calculation
under this subsection shall be subject to available funds.

CHAPTER 180 7
(18) Notwithstanding any other statute or budget of the Commonwealth language to the contrary, time missed due
to shortening days for emergencies may be made up by lengthening school days in the school calendar without
any loss of funds under the program to support education excellence in Kentucky.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established the school of innovation pilot project to provide school districts with the
opportunity to explore innovative school operation models.
(2) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be known as the
school of innovation pilot project fund. The fund shall consist of moneys received from state
appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Department of Education.
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used to support the school of innovation pilot project under
this section and no other purpose.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse
but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(3) The school of innovation pilot project shall begin August 1, 2026, and end June 30, 2028, and shall consist
of:
(a) Beginning with the first year of the pilot project, any school of innovation established by Covington
Independent School District; and
(b) To the extent funds are available and beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, a cohort of two (2)
schools of innovation chosen from applications submitted by local boards of education that meet the
following criteria:
1. The applicant has previously or concurrently been approved under Section 2 of this Act for a
school of innovation;
2. The school of innovation is not a virtual program as defined in KRS 157.320;
3. The application proposes a significant innovative educational opportunity to improve student
outcomes, school operations, or both through approaches that would be difficult or
impractical to implement under existing statutory or regulatory requirements; and
4. The applicant identifies matching moneys consisting of district revenues, philanthropic
contributions, or other funds that are to be dedicated for the operation of the school of
innovation until the end of the pilot project and which shall be eligible to serve as matching
funds under subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The Kentucky Board of Education shall:
(a) Establish an annual timeline for application submission and approval for each year of the pilot
project; and
(b) Review and approve two (2) applications under subsection (3) of this section for admission into the
pilot project under subsection (3)(b) of this section to the extent that funds are available during the
operation of the pilot project. The department shall distribute funds from the school of innovation
pilot project fund to an approved applicant in amounts that match the funds dedicated by the
approved applicant under subsection (3) of this section. The funds shall be distributed on a regular
schedule to the approved applicant so long as the applicant operates the school of innovation as
outlined in the approved application. An approved applicant may submit an amended application so
long as the amended application continues to meet the minimum requirements of subsection (3) of
this section. Both the matching funds and the pilot project funds shall be restricted to the operation
and support of the school of innovation, unless granted a waiver from the Kentucky Board of
Education.
(5) At the end of each school year, a school district participating in the pilot project shall submit to the
Kentucky Department of Education a report which shall be compiled by the department and submitted to
the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Education. The report
shall include:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) A description of the district's school of innovation activities during the school year and how the
school is innovating, including innovations through the waiving of statute or administrative
regulation;
(b) The education service providers and any other entities the school district has partnered with for the
operation of the school of innovation;
(c) A general accounting of how the district and matching pilot project funds have been used;
(d) The academic programs offered by the school of innovation;
(e) The enrollment details of the school of innovation;
(f) What student and school performance factors the district shall use to determine success of the school
of innovation and the current status on those factors; and
(g) What hindrances to innovation the district may have encountered.
(6) Matching funds for the pilot project may include contributions from one (1) or more private or
philanthropic entities, including nonprofit organizations that partner with school districts to support the
design or implementation of schools of innovation.
(7) An application under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) May be submitted collectively by two (2) or more local boards of education; and
(b) Shall identify the waivers applicable to each school district, the responsibilities of each school district
in operating the school of innovation, and the matching funds each school district shall provide to
support the school of innovation.
(8) If the Kentucky Board of Education at any time finds by a two-thirds (2/3) majority vote that the operation
of the school of innovation under this subsection has endangered students, impeded student academic
achievement, or supported financial malfeasance or criminal activity, then the school of innovation's
participation in the long-term component of the school of innovation pilot project shall be terminated and
no further funds shall be distributed.
Section 6. For the school of innovation under subsection (3)(a) of Section 5 of this Act:
(1) By August 1, 2026, the board of education of Covington Independent Schools shall submit the district’s
collection of waivers pursuant to Section 2 of this Act for establishing any school of innovation within the district to
the Kentucky Board of Education for inclusion under subsection (3)(a) of Section 5 of this Act;
(2) Notwithstanding any requirement of KRS 156.161 to the contrary, within thirty days of the submission
under subsection (1) of this section, the Kentucky Board of Education shall approve any waiver requested for a
school of innovation that satisfies the requirements of subsection (1) of Section 2 of this Act;
(3) Any distribution of funds shall be to Educate NKY Inc. to support the establishment of schools of
innovation within the Covington Independent School District and shall be conditioned upon an agreement between
Educate NKY Inc. and the Covington Independent School District for the support and operation of schools of
innovation; and
(4) Funds distributed shall only be used for the operation of the schools of innovation within the Covington
Independent School District.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.